Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB66.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 189A.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person shall not operate or be in physical control of a motor vehicle anywhere in this Commonwealth[state]:
(a) Having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more as measured by a scientifically reliable test or tests of
a sample of the person's breath or blood taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical
control of a motor vehicle;
(b) While under the influence of alcohol;
(c) While under the influence of any other substance or combination of substances which impairs one's
driving ability;
(d) While the presence of a controlled substance listed in subsection (12) of this section is detected in the
blood, as measured by a scientifically reliable test, or tests, taken within two (2) hours of cessation of
operation or physical control of a motor vehicle;
(e) While under the combined influence of alcohol and any other substance which impairs one's driving
ability; or
(f) Having an alcohol concentration of 0.02 or more as measured by a scientifically reliable test or tests of
a sample of the person's breath or blood taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical
control of a motor vehicle, if the person is under the age of twenty-one (21).
(2) With the exception of the results of the tests administered pursuant to KRS 189A.103(7):
(a) If the sample of the person's blood or breath that is used to determine the alcohol concentration thereof
was obtained more than two (2) hours after cessation of operation or physical control of a motor
vehicle, the results of the test or tests shall be inadmissible as evidence in a prosecution under
subsection (1)(a) or (f) of this section. The results of the test or tests, however, may be admissible in a
prosecution under subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this section; or
(b) If the sample of the person's blood that is used to determine the presence of a controlled substance was
obtained more than two (2) hours after cessation of operation or physical control of a motor vehicle, the
results of the test or tests shall be inadmissible as evidence in a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of
this section. The results of the test or tests, however, may be admissible in a prosecution under
subsection (1)(c) or (e) of this section.
(3) In any prosecution for a violation of subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this section in which the defendant is charged
with having operated or been in physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, the
alcohol concentration in the defendant's blood as determined at the time of making analysis of his or her blood
or breath shall give rise to the following presumptions:
(a) If there was an alcohol concentration of less than 0.04[ based upon the definition of alcohol
concentration in KRS 189A.005], it shall be presumed that the defendant was not under the influence of
alcohol; and
(b) If there was an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or greater but less than 0.08[ based upon the definition of
alcohol concentration in KRS 189A.005], that fact shall not constitute a presumption that the defendant
either was or was not under the influence of alcohol, but that fact may be considered, together with
other competent evidence, in determining the guilt or innocence of the defendant.
[The provisions of ]This subsection shall not be construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent
evidence bearing upon the questions of whether the defendant was under the influence of alcohol or other
substances, in any prosecution for a violation of subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this section.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(4) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the fact that any person charged with violation
of subsection (1) of this section is legally entitled to use any substance, including alcohol, shall not
constitute a defense against any charge of violation of subsection (1) of this section.
(b) A laboratory test or tests for a controlled substance shall be inadmissible as evidence in a prosecution
under subsection (1)(d) of this section upon a finding by the court that the defendant consumed the
substance under a valid prescription from a practitioner, as defined in KRS 218A.010, acting in the
course of his or her professional practice. However, a laboratory test for a controlled substance may be
admissible as evidence in a prosecution under subsection (1)(c) or (e) of this section.
(5) Any person who violates the provisions of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of subsection (1) of this section
shall:
(a) For the first offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor
more than five hundred dollars ($500), or be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than forty-eight
(48) hours nor more than thirty (30) days, or both. Following sentencing, the defendant may apply to
the judge for permission to enter a community labor program for not less than forty-eight (48) hours nor
more than thirty (30) days in lieu of fine or imprisonment, or both. If any of the aggravating
circumstances listed in subsection (11) of this section are present while the person was operating or in
physical control of a motor vehicle, the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment shall be four (4)
days, which term shall not be suspended, probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other
form of early release;
(b) For the second offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than three hundred fifty dollars
($350) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) and shall be imprisoned in the county jail for not less
than seven (7) days nor more than six (6) months and, in addition to fine and imprisonment, may be
sentenced to community labor for not less than ten (10) days nor more than six (6) months. If any of the
aggravating circumstances listed in subsection (11) of this section are present, the mandatory minimum
term of imprisonment shall be fourteen (14) days, which term shall not be suspended, probated,
conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early release;
(c) For a third offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor
more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than
thirty (30) days nor more than twelve (12) months and may, in addition to fine and imprisonment, be
sentenced to community labor for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than twelve (12) months. If
any of the aggravating circumstances listed in subsection (11) of this section are present, the mandatory
minimum term of imprisonment shall be sixty (60) days, which term shall not be suspended, probated,
conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early release;
(d) For a fourth or subsequent offense within a ten (10) year period, be guilty of a Class D felony. If any of
the aggravating circumstances listed in subsection (11) of this section are present, the mandatory
minimum term of imprisonment shall be two hundred forty (240) days, which term shall not be
suspended, probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of release; and
(e) For purposes of this subsection, prior offenses shall include all convictions in this
Commonwealth[state], and any other state or jurisdiction, for operating or being in control of a motor
vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or other substances that impair one's driving ability, or any
combination of alcohol and such substances, or while having an unlawful alcohol concentration, or
driving while intoxicated, but shall not include convictions for violating subsection (1)(f) of this
section. A court shall receive as proof of a prior conviction a copy of that conviction, certified by the
court ordering the conviction.
(6) Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (1)(f) of this section shall be fined no less than one
hundred dollars ($100) and no more than five hundred dollars ($500), or sentenced to twenty (20) hours of
community service in lieu of a fine. A person subject to the penalties of this subsection shall not be subject to
the penalties established in subsection (5) of this section or any other penalty established pursuant to KRS
Chapter 189A, except those established in KRS 189A.040(1) and KRS 189A.070.
(7) If the person is under the age of twenty-one (21) and there was an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or greater[
based on the definition of alcohol concentration in KRS 189A.005], the person shall be subject to the penalties
established pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

CHAPTER 193 3
(8) (a) For a second or third offense within a ten (10) year period, the minimum sentence of imprisonment or
community labor shall not be suspended, probated, or subject to conditional discharge or other form of
early release.
(b) For a fourth or subsequent offense under this section, the minimum term of imprisonment shall be one
hundred twenty (120) days, and this term shall not be suspended, probated, or subject to conditional
discharge or other form of early release.
(c) For a second or subsequent offense, at least forty-eight (48) hours of the mandatory sentence shall be
served consecutively.
(9) When sentencing persons under subsection (5)(a) of this section, at least one (1) of the penalties shall be
assessed and that penalty shall not be suspended, probated, or subject to conditional discharge or other form of
early release.
(10) In determining the ten (10) year period under this section, the period shall be measured from the dates on
which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of conviction were entered.
(11) For purposes of this section, aggravating circumstances are any one (1) or more of the following:
(a) Operating a motor vehicle in excess of thirty (30) miles per hour above the speed limit;
(b) Operating a motor vehicle in the wrong direction on a limited access highway;
(c) Operating a motor vehicle that causes an accident resulting in death or serious physical injury as
defined in KRS 500.080;
(d) Operating a motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration in the operator's blood or breath is 0.15 or
more as measured by a test or tests of a sample of the operator's blood or breath taken within two (2)
hours of cessation of operation of the motor vehicle;
(e) Refusing to submit to any test [or tests ]of one's [blood, ]breath[, or urine] requested by an officer
having reasonable grounds to believe the person was operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle
in violation of subsection (1) of this section, except it shall not be considered an aggravating
circumstance for a first offense under subsection (5)(a) of this section; and
(f) Operating a motor vehicle that is transporting a passenger under the age of twelve (12) years old.
(12) The substances applicable to a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of this section are:
(a) Any Schedule I controlled substance except marijuana;
(b) Alprazolam;
(c) Amphetamine;
(d) Buprenorphine;
(e) Butalbital;
(f) Carisoprodol;
(g) Clonazepam;
(h) Cocaine;
(i)[(h)] Cyclobenzaprine;
(j) Diazepam;
(k)[(i)] Fentanyl;
(l) Hydrocodone;
(m)[(j)] Meprobamate;
(n)[(k)] Methadone;
(o)[(l)] Methamphetamine;
(p)[(m)] Oxycodone;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(q)[(n)] Promethazine;
(r)[(o)] Propoxyphene; and
(s)[(p)] Zolpidem.
Section 2. KRS 189A.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Law enforcement agencies may administer preliminary breath tests using devices or equipment which
will ensure an accurate determination of blood alcohol content. Preliminary breath[Such] tests may be
administered in the field to a person suspected of violation of KRS 189A.010 before the person is
arrested. This test may be administered in addition to any other blood alcohol level test authorized by
law.
(b) 1. A person's refusal to take a preliminary breath test shall not:
a. Be used against him or her in a court of law or in any administrative proceeding; or
b. Result in the suspension of his or her license by the court at the time of arraignment.
2. Prior to the administration of preliminary breath test, a person suspected of violating Section 1
of this Act shall be informed of the provisions of subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.
(2) (a) Law enforcement agencies may record on film or videotape or by other visual and audible means:
1. The pursuit of a violator or suspected violator;
2. The traffic stop; or
3. a. Field sobriety tests administered at the scene or such tests at a police station, jail, or other
suitable facility; or
b. The refusal of a violator or suspected violator to submit to tests under KRS 189A.103;
for a suspected violation of KRS 189A.010.
(b) Recordings made under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be subject to the following conditions:
1. The testing is recorded in its entirety, [(]except for blood alcohol analysis testing[)];
2. The entire recording of the field sobriety tests or refusal and the entire recording of the pursuit
and traffic stop is shown in court unless the defendant waives the showing of any portions not
offered by the prosecution;
3. The entire recording is available to be shown by the defense at trial if the defendant [so ]desires
regardless of whether it was introduced by the Commonwealth;
4. The defendant or his or her counsel is afforded an opportunity to view the entire recording a
reasonable time before the trial in order to prepare an adequate defense;
5. Recordings shall be used for official purposes only, which shall include viewing:
a. [Viewing ]In court;
b. [Viewing ]By the prosecution and defense in preparation for a trial; and
c. [Viewing ]For purposes of administrative reviews and official administrative proceedings.
Recordings shall otherwise be considered as confidential records;
6. The videotape or film taken in accordance with this section shall, upon order of the sentencing
court, be destroyed after the later of the following:
a. Fourteen (14) months, if there is no appeal of any criminal or traffic case filed as a result
of the videotape or film, or if the videotape or film does not record the actual happening of
an accident involving a motor vehicle;
b. Fourteen (14) months after a decision has been made not to prosecute any case upon
which an arrest has been made or a citation issued as a result of the videotape or film, if
the videotape does not record the actual happening of an accident involving a motor
vehicle;

CHAPTER 193 5
c. Twenty-six (26) months, if there is no appeal of any criminal or traffic case filed as a
result of the videotape or film, if the videotape or film records the actual happening of an
accident involving a motor vehicle;
d. After all appeals have been exhausted arising from any criminal or traffic case filed as a
result of the videotape;
e. At the conclusion of any civil case arising from events depicted on the videotape or film;
or
f. At the conclusion of the exhaustion of all appeals arising from any law enforcement
agency administrative proceedings arising from events depicted on the videotape or film;
and
7. Public officials or employees utilizing or showing recordings other than as permitted in this
chapter or permitting others to do so shall be guilty of official misconduct in the first degree
under KRS 522.020.
(3) When a peace officer makes a videotape or film recording of any transaction covered by subsection (2) of this
section and a citation is issued or an arrest is made, the peace officer shall note on the uniform citation that a
videotape has been made of the transaction.
Section 3. KRS 189A.105 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person's refusal to submit to tests under KRS 189A.103 shall result in suspension of his or her driving
privilege as provided in this chapter.
(2) (a) At the time a breath[,] or blood[, or urine] test is requested, the person shall be informed that:
1. [That, ]If the person refuses to submit to a breath test[such tests]:
a. The fact of this refusal may be used against him or her in court as evidence of violating
KRS 189A.010 and will result in suspension of his or her driver's license by the court at
the time of arraignment; and
b. If the person is subsequently convicted of violating KRS 189A.010(1):
i. For a second or third time within a ten (10) year period, he or she will be subject to
a mandatory minimum jail sentence which is twice as long as the mandatory
minimum jail sentence imposed if he or she submits to the tests; and
ii. His or her license will be suspended by the Transportation Cabinet;
2. If the person refuses to submit to a blood test:
a. The fact of this refusal shall not be used against him or her in court as evidence of
violating Section 1 of this Act but will result in suspension of his or her driver's license
by the court at the time of arraignment; and
b. If the person is subsequently convicted of violating subsection (1) of Section 1 of this
Act, his or her license will be suspended by the Transportation Cabinet;
3. [That, ]If a test is taken:
a. The results of the test may be used against the person in court as evidence of violating
KRS 189A.010(1); and
b. The person has the right to have a test or tests of his or her blood performed by a person of
his or her choosing described in KRS 189A.103 within a reasonable time of his or her
arrest at the expense of the person arrested; and
4.[3.] [That ]Although his or her license will be suspended, he or she may be eligible immediately for
an ignition interlock license allowing him or her to drive during the period of suspension and, if
he or she is convicted, he or she will receive a credit toward any other ignition interlock
requirement arising from this arrest.
(b) [Nothing in ]This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit a judge of a court of competent
jurisdiction from issuing a search warrant or other court order requiring a blood [or urine ]test[, or a
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
combination thereof,] of a defendant charged with a violation of KRS 189A.010, or other statutory
violation arising from the incident. However, if the incident involves a motor vehicle accident in which
there was a fatality, the investigating peace officer shall seek [such ]a search warrant for blood testing
unless the testing has already been done by consent. If testing done pursuant to a warrant reveals the
presence of alcohol or any other substance that impaired the driving ability of a person who is charged
and convicted of a violation of KRS 189A.010(1), the sentencing court shall require, in addition to any
other sentencing provision, that the defendant make restitution to the Commonwealth[state] for the cost
of the testing.
(c) 1. When directed by a peace officer pursuant to a search warrant or other court order issued under
this subsection, a qualified medical professional shall withdraw the sample of blood as soon as
practicable and shall deliver the sample to the requesting peace officer, or other peace officer as
directed by the requesting peace officer, if[provided that] the collection of the sample does not
jeopardize the person's life, cause serious injury to the person, or seriously impede the person's
medical assessment, care, or treatment.
2. The qualified medical professional authorized to withdraw the blood sample and the medical care
facility where the blood sample is drawn shall be considered as acting in good faith once
presented with a search warrant or other court order issued under this subsection. The qualified
medical professional shall not require the person that is the subject of the test or tests to provide
any additional consent.
3. A qualified medical professional who administers any test under this paragraph upon the request
of a peace officer, and a medical care facility where any test under this paragraph may be
performed, shall not be criminally liable solely for administering the requested test or civilly
liable for damages to the person tested solely for administering the requested test except in cases
of gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
(d) If the person is not informed of the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection prior to the request
for a breath or blood test, the person shall not have his or her:
1. Refusal to submit to a breath or blood test used:
a. Against him or her in court as evidence of violating Section 1 of this Act; or
b. As an aggravating circumstance under subsection (11) of Section 1 of this Act; or
2. License suspended by the court at the time of arraignment.
(3) During the period immediately preceding the administration of any test, the person shall be afforded an
opportunity of at least ten (10) minutes but not more than fifteen (15) minutes to attempt to contact and
communicate with an attorney and shall be informed of this right. Inability to communicate with an attorney
during this period shall not be deemed to relieve the person of his or her obligation to submit to the tests and
the penalties specified by KRS 189A.010 and 189A.107 shall remain applicable to the person upon refusal.
[Nothing in ]This section shall not be deemed to create a right to have an attorney present during the
administration of the tests, but the person's attorney may be present if the attorney can physically appear at the
location where the test is to be administered within the time period established in this section.
(4) Immediately following the administration of the final test requested by the officer, the person shall again be
informed of his or her right to have a test or tests of his or her blood performed by a person of his or her
choosing described in KRS 189A.103 within a reasonable time of his or her arrest at the expense of the person
arrested. He or she shall then be asked, "Do you want such a test?" The officer shall make reasonable efforts to
provide transportation to the tests.
Section 4. KRS 186.018 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of maintaining driving history records of operators of motor vehicles of the Commonwealth, the
files of the Transportation Cabinet shall be used to ascertain the driving history record of each person who is
licensed to operate a motor vehicle within the Commonwealth.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the Transportation Cabinet shall destroy, and
shall not maintain, records of moving traffic convictions that are more than ten (10)[five (5)] years old.
(3) For any licensee who now holds, who has applied for, or has ever held a commercial driver's license or
commercial learner's permit issued pursuant to KRS 281A.120 or 281A.170, the cabinet shall keep conviction
records indefinitely.

CHAPTER 193 7
(4) The Transportation Cabinet shall not release information on the driving history record of a person under the
age of twenty-one (21) whose operator license has been suspended pursuant to KRS 189A.010(6). The cabinet
shall destroy, and shall not maintain, the record of the suspension of a person's operator's license if the license
was suspended pursuant to KRS 189A.010(6), within five (5) working days of the person's operator's license
being reinstated. This subsection shall not apply to a person who holds, or is required to hold, a commercial
driver's license or commercial learner's permit.
(5) The cabinet shall charge a fee of three dollars ($3) for any driving history record, ten cents ($0.10) of which
shall be deposited in a special account within the road fund to be used exclusively by the Transportation
Cabinet for the state driver education program as designated in KRS 186.535.
Signed by Governor April 23, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version